Vermont, session 2025-2026, H107.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 1041 is amended to read:
§ 1041. EXERCISE OF RIGHTS TO FREE SPEECH AND TO PETITION
GOVERNMENT FOR REDRESS OF GRIEVANCES; SPECIAL
MOTION TO STRIKE
(a)(1) This section shall apply to a civil action filed against a person based
on the person’s:
(A) exercise of the right to freedom of speech or to petition the
government on a public issue; and
(B) the making of a good faith report or complaint regarding:
(i) a violation of 13 V.S.A. chapter 59 (lewdness and prostitution);
(ii) a violation of 13 V.S.A. chapter 72 (sexual assault);
(iii) a violation of a sexual harassment policy required by 21
V.S.A. § 495h or the provisions of 21 V.S.A. § 495h(a) requiring a workplace
free from sexual harassment; or
(iv) an incident of retaliation for the making of a report or
complaint based on subdivisions (i)–(iii) of this subdivision (a)(1)(B), provided
the person had a reasonable basis to make such a report or complaint,
regardless of whether a criminal, civil, or administration action was initiated.
VT LEG #379563 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.107
2025 Page 3 of 6
(2) A defendant in an action arising from the defendant’s exercise, in
connection with a public issue, of the right to freedom of speech or to petition
the government for redress of grievances under the U.S. or Vermont
Constitution identified in subdivision (1) of this subsection may file a special
motion to strike under this section.
(b) A special motion to strike under this section shall be filed with the court
and served on all parties not more than 60 days after the filing of the
complaint. A party may file a response to the motion not more than 15 days
after the motion is served on the party. The court may extend the time limits of
this subsection for good cause shown.
(c)(1) The filing of a special motion to strike under this section shall stay
all discovery proceedings in the action. Except as provided in subdivision (2)
of this subsection, the stay of discovery shall remain in effect until the court
rules on the special motion to strike.
(2) The court, on motion and for good cause shown, may order that
limited discovery be conducted for the purpose of assisting its decision on the
special motion to strike.
(d) The court shall hold a hearing on a special motion to strike not more
than 30 days after service of the motion unless good cause exists for an
extension.
VT LEG #379563 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.107
2025 Page 4 of 6
(e)(1) The court shall grant the special motion to strike, unless the plaintiff
shows that:
(A) the defendant’s exercise of his or her the right to freedom of
speech and to petition the government on a public issue or making of a good
faith report or complaint as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section
was devoid of any reasonable factual support and any arguable basis in law;
and
(B) the defendant’s acts caused actual injury to the plaintiff.
(2) In making its determination, the court shall consider the pleadings
and supporting and opposing affidavits stating the facts upon which the
liability or defense is based.
(f)(1) If the court grants the special motion to strike, the court shall award
compensatory damages, costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees to the defendant
and may award punitive damages, if appropriate. If the court denies the special
motion to strike and finds the motion is frivolous or is intended solely to cause
unnecessary delay, the court shall award compensatory damages, costs, and
reasonable attorney’s fees to the plaintiff and may award punitive damages, if
appropriate.
(2) Neither the court’s ruling on the special motion to strike nor the fact
that it made such a ruling shall be admissible in evidence at any later stage of
VT LEG #379563 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.107
2025 Page 5 of 6
the case, and no burden of proof or degree of proof otherwise applicable shall
be affected by the ruling.
(g) An order granting or denying a special motion to strike shall be
appealable in the same manner as an interlocutory order under Rule 5 of the
Vermont Rules of Appellate Procedure.
(h) This section shall not apply to:
(1) any enforcement action or criminal proceeding brought by the State
of Vermont or any political subdivision thereof; or
(2) a case involving tortious interference with legally protected health
care as provided in section 7302 of this title.
(i) As used in this section, “the exercise, in connection with a public issue,
of the right to freedom of speech or to petition the government for redress of
grievances under the U.S. or Vermont Constitution” “exercise of the right to
freedom of speech or to petition the government on a public issue” includes:
(1) any written or oral statement made before a legislative, executive, or
judicial proceeding, or any other official proceeding authorized by law;
(2) any written or oral statement made in connection with an issue under
consideration or review by a legislative, executive, or judicial body, or any
other official proceeding authorized by law;
(3) any written or oral statement concerning an issue of public interest
made in a public forum or a place open to the public; or
VT LEG #379563 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.107
2025 Page 6 of 6
(4) any other statement or conduct concerning a public issue or an issue
of public interest that furthers the exercise of the constitutional right of
freedom of speech or the constitutional right to petition the government for
redress of grievances.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379563 v.1